Utah statutes.
77-22a-2.   Service of administrative subpoena.

(1)  A subpoena issued under this section may be served by any person designated in the subpoena for that purpose.  Service upon a natural person may be made by personal delivery of the subpoena to him.  Service may be made upon a domestic or foreign corporation or upon a partnership or other unincorporated association subject to suit under a common name by delivering the subpoena to an officer, managing or general agent, or other agent authorized by appointment or law to receive service of process.

(2)  The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena, when entered on a copy of the subpoena by the person serving it, is proof of service.



Enacted by Chapter 9, 1989 General Session

